Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2896.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34-36-29 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-36 entitled
"Condominium Ownership" is hereby amended to read as follows:
34-36-29. Insurance.
(a) The manager, management committee, or association of unit owners, if required by the
declaration, bylaws, or by a majority of the unit owners, or at the request of a mortgagee having a
first mortgage of record covering a unit, shall have the authority to, and shall, obtain insurance for
the property against loss or damage by fire and other hazards under the terms and for amounts as
shall be required or requested. Insurance coverage shall be written on the property in the name of
the manager, management committee, or association of unit owners, as trustee for each of the unit
owners in the percentages established in the declaration. Premiums on insurance shall be common
expenses. Provision for insurance shall be without prejudice to the right of each unit owner to insure
his or her own unit for his or her benefit. Provided, however, a unit’s owners insurance policy shall
become the primary insurance policy with respect to any loss covered by the association’s policy
but not payable under the association’s policy because of the application of the deductible. The
provisions of § 34-36.1-3.13, as amended, shall apply.
(b) In the event a unit owner sustains damage to their unit as a result of an event that is
covered under the insurance coverage purchased in accordance with subsection (a), then, upon
written request to the condominium association, the unit owner shall be entitled to a written copy
from the condominium association of the insurance company damage appraisal, or any damage

appraisal in regard to damage to the owner’s unit, within fourteen (14) calendar days of the date of
the unit owner’s request, or within fourteen (14) days of the association’s receipt of the damage
appraisal, whichever is later. If coverage for the damage to a unit is denied for any reason, or is
deemed to be valued below the policy deductible, then the unit owner shall also be entitled to
receive, from the association, a copy of the letter detailing the determination.
SECTION 2. Sections 34-36.1-1.02 and 34-36.1-3.13 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-
36.1 entitled "Condominium Law" are hereby amended to read as follows:
34-36.1-1.02. Applicability.
(a)(1) This chapter applies to all condominiums created within this state after July 1, 1982,
except that any condominium created within this state prior to July 1, 1982, may voluntarily accept
the provisions of this chapter in lieu of the provisions under which it was originally organized.
Acceptance shall be evidenced by an agreement in writing executed by and in behalf of the
condominium association and by all of the owners of all of the individual condominium units within
the condominium, in which agreement it is clearly stated that they all accept the provisions of this
chapter in lieu of those in the statute under which the condominium was organized and wish to be
governed in the future by the provisions of this chapter. The agreement shall be recorded in the
land evidence records of each and every town or city where all or any part of the land in the
condominium concerned may be located and shall become effective when first so recorded. The
acceptance shall only apply to the governance of the condominium concerned as to all matters
which are prospective or executory in nature; and nothing herein shall be deemed to abrogate,
amend, limit, effect, or impair the continued effectiveness, legality, or validity of all actions
lawfully taken by or in behalf of the condominium prior to the effective date of the acceptance,
including, but without limitation, the condominium declaration and all amendments thereto, the by-
laws of the condominium and/or of its association, all deeds, mortgages, leases, and any further
documents affecting the titles or rights of unit owners, or of the condominium or the prior lawful
acts or deeds of any kind, of the condominium association, its officers, directors, or members.
(2) Sections 34-36.1-1.05 (separate titles and taxation), 34-36.1-1.06 (applicability of local
ordinances, regulations, and building codes), 34-36.1-1.07 (eminent domain), 34-36.1-2.03
(construction and validity of declaration and bylaws), 34-36.1-2.04 (description of units), 34-36.1-
2.19(b) (mortgage approval), 34-36.1-3.02(a)(1) — (6) and (11) — (17) (powers of unit owners’
association), 34-36.1-3.06(c) — (d) (bylaws), 34-36.1-3.08 (meetings and notice), 34-36.1-3.11
(tort and contract liability), 34-36.1-3.13(d) and (k) (unit owner responsibility for master policy
deductibles) (insurance), 34-36.1-3.16 (lien for assessments), 34-36.1-3.18 (association records),
34-36.1-4.09 (resale of units), and 34-36.1-4.17 (effect of violation on rights of action; attorney’s
LC005233/SUB A - Page 2 of 9

fees), § 34-36.1-3.20 (enforcement of declaration, bylaws and rules), and 34-36.1-1.03
(definitions), to the extent necessary in construing any of those sections, apply to all condominiums
created in this state before July 1, 1982; but those sections apply only with respect to events and
circumstances occurring after July 1, 1982, and do not invalidate existing provisions of the
declaration, bylaws, plats, or plans of those condominiums.
(3) A condominium created as an additional phase by amendment of a condominium
created prior to July 1, 1982, if the original declaration contemplated the amendment, shall be
deemed to be a condominium created prior to July 1, 1982; provided, however, the provisions of
subdivision (a)(2) shall apply as defined therein.
(4) Section 34-36.1-3.21 (foreclosure of condominium lien) applies, with respect to all
condominiums created in this state prior to June 19, 1991, only with respect to events and
circumstances occurring after June 18, 1991, does not invalidate existing provisions of the
declarations, bylaws, plats, or plans of those condominiums, and applies in all respects to all
condominiums created in this state after June 18, 1991.
(b) The provisions of the Condominium Ownership Act, chapter 36 of this title, do not
apply to condominiums created after July 1, 1982, and do not invalidate any amendment to the
declaration, bylaws, plats, and plans of any condominium created before July 1, 1982, if the
amendment would be permitted by this chapter. The amendment must be adopted in conformity
with the procedures and requirements specified by those instruments and by chapter 36 of this title.
If the amendment grants to any person any rights, powers, or privileges permitted by this chapter,
all correlative obligations, liabilities, and restrictions in this chapter also apply to that person.
(c) This chapter does not apply to condominiums or units located outside this state, but the
public offering statement provisions (§§ 34-36.1-4.02 — 34-36.1-4.07) apply to all contracts for
the disposition thereof signed in this state by any party unless exempt under § 34-36.1-4.01(b).
34-36.1-3.13. Insurance.
(a) Commencing not later than the time of the first conveyance of a unit to a person other
than a declarant, the association shall maintain, at a minimum, to the extent reasonably available:
(1) Property insurance on the common elements insuring against all risks of direct, physical
loss commonly insured against or, in the case of a conversion building, against fire and extended
coverage perils. The association shall also maintain insurance on the units as originally built or on
the units including improvements and betterments added by unit owners if required in the
declaration or bylaws. The total amount of insurance after application of any deductibles shall be
not less than eighty percent (80%) of the actual cash value of the insured property at the time the
insurance is purchased and at each renewal date, exclusive of land, excavations, foundations, and
LC005233/SUB A - Page 3 of 9

other items normally excluded from property policies; and
(2) Liability insurance, including medical payments insurance, in an amount determined
by the executive board, but not less than any amount specified in the declaration, covering all
occurrences commonly insured against for death, bodily injury, and property damage arising out
of, or in connection with, the use, ownership, or maintenance of the common elements and any
property owned or leased by the association.
(b) In the case of a building containing units having horizontal boundaries described in the
declaration, the insurance maintained under subdivision (a)(1), to the extent reasonably available,
shall include the units, but need not include improvements and betterments installed by unit owners.
(c)(b) If the insurance described in subsections (a) and (b) subsection (a) of this section is
not reasonably available, the association promptly shall cause notice of that fact to be hand
delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to all unit owners.
(c) The declaration may require the association to carry any other insurance, and the
association in any event may carry any other insurance it deems appropriate to protect the
association or the unit owners.
(d) Insurance policies carried pursuant to subsection (a) must provide that:
(1) Each unit owner is an insured person under the policy with respect to liability arising
out of the owner’s interest in the common elements or membership in the association;
(2) The insurer waives its right to subrogation under the policy against any unit owner or
member of the owner’s household;
(3) No act or omission by any unit owner, unless acting within the scope of his or her
authority on behalf of the association, will void the policy or be a condition to recovery under the
policy; and
(4) If, at the time of a loss under the policy, there is other insurance in the name of a unit
owner covering the same risk covered by the policy, the association’s policy provides primary
insurance. Provided, however, a unit owner’s insurance policy shall become the primary insurance
policy with respect to any amount of loss to their unit covered by the association’s policy but not
payable under the association’s policy because of the application of the deductible. If a unit owner
fails to comply with obligations pursuant to subsection (k) of this section, the unit owner shall have
the obligation for expenses related to the owner’s unit after a unit loss in the amount of the
deductible of the association property insurance applicable to the unit. The association shall provide
written notice to the unit owners setting forth the amount of deductible for the association property
insurance for their units at least thirty (30) days after notice to the association by the insurance
carrier of any change in the association property insurance deductible. The notice shall include a
LC005233/SUB A - Page 4 of 9

statement asserting the unit owner’s legal obligation to notify its mortgagee of the change in any
deductible.
(i) If the covered loss is solely to the common elements, the amount of the loss up to the
association’s deductible amount and any amount remaining unpaid after the payment(s) from the
association’s policy, shall be a common expense.
(ii) If the covered loss is solely to one unit and there is one singular deductible for the
association’s policy applicable to such loss, the amount of the loss up to the association’s deductible
amount and any amount remaining unpaid after the payment(s) from the association’s policy, shall
be the responsibility of the owner of said unit.
(iii) If the covered loss is to one or more units and there is a ‘per unit’ deductible applicable
to such loss, the amount of the loss up to the association’s per unit deductible amount assigned to
each unit and any amount remaining unpaid after the payment(s) from the association’s policy for
damage sustained to that unit, shall be the responsibility of the owner of said unit(s).
(iv) In the event that there is a covered loss to more than one unit or a covered loss to a
unit(s) and the common elements and there is one singular deductible for the association’s policy
applicable to such loss, the association’s policy deductible shall be apportioned to and borne by the
unit(s) and the association, if applicable, in the same proportion as applies to the amount of the
damages to or among such units and the common elements with respect to such loss and any
amounts remaining unpaid after the payment(s) from the association’s policy for damage sustained
to that unit or common elements, shall be the responsibility of the owner of said unit(s),
respectively, and a common expense with respect to the common elements.
(v) In the event that there is a covered loss to one or more units and a covered loss to the
common elements, and there is a “per unit” deductible and “per occurrence” deductible for the
association’s policy applicable to such loss, the amount of the loss up to the association’s per unit
deductible amount assigned to each unit and any amount remaining unpaid for those unit(s) after
the payment(s) from the association’s policy for damage sustained to that unit, shall be the
responsibility of the owner of said unit(s) and the amount of the loss up to the association’s per
occurrence deductible amount and any amount remaining unpaid for the common elements after
the payment(s) from the association’s policy shall be a common expense.
(e) Any loss covered by the property policy under subdivision (a)(1) and subsection (b)
must be adjusted with the association, but the insurance proceeds for that loss are payable to any
insurance trustee designated for that purpose, or otherwise to the association, and not to any
mortgagee or beneficiary under a deed of trust. The insurance trustee or the association shall hold
any insurance proceeds in trust for unit owners and lien holders as their interests may appear.
LC005233/SUB A - Page 5 of 9

Subject to the provisions of subsection (h), the proceeds must be disbursed first for the repair or
restoration of the damaged property, and unit owners and lien holders are not entitled to receive
payment of any portion of the proceeds unless there is a surplus of proceeds after the property has
been completed, repaired or restored, or the condominium is terminated.
(f) An insurance policy issued to the association does not prevent a unit owner from
obtaining insurance for his or her own benefit.
(g) An insurer that has issued an insurance policy under this section shall issue certificates
or memoranda of insurance to the association and, upon written request, to any unit owner,
mortgagee, or beneficiary under a deed of trust. The insurer issuing the policy may not cancel or
refuse to renew it until thirty (30) days after notice of the proposed cancellation or nonrenewal has
been mailed to the association, each unit owner, and each mortgagee or beneficiary under a deed
of trust to whom a certificate or memorandum of insurance has been issued at their respective last
known addresses.
(h) Any portion of the condominium for which insurance is required under this section that
is damaged or destroyed shall be repaired or replaced promptly by the association unless: (1) The
condominium is terminated The loss is solely to a unit(s) and the amount of the loss does not
exceed the association’s policy deductible; (2) Repair or replacement would be illegal under any
state or local health or safety statute or ordinance The condominium is terminated; or (3) Eighty
percent (80%) of the unit owners, including every owner of a unit or assigned, limited common
element that will not be rebuilt, vote not to rebuild unless insurance proceeds are adequate to rebuild
Repair or replacement would be illegal under any state or local health or safety statute or ordinance;
or (4) Eighty percent (80%) of the unit owners, including every owner of a unit or assigned, limited
common element that will not be rebuilt, vote not to rebuild unless insurance proceeds are adequate
to rebuild. The cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance proceeds, after the application
of the association’s policy deductible, is a common expense, unless the declaration or bylaws
provide otherwise. In the event of a loss where there is coverage and insurance proceeds from both
the unit owner’s policy and the association’s policy, the repair or replacement of any damaged or
destroyed portion of the condominium shall be carried out as the governing board shall determine.
The governing board shall use and disburse the applicable insurance proceeds, to carry out any
repairs to the common elements and the unit(s) upon reasonable terms and conditions aligned with
the progress of repairs. In lieu of the distribution of the insurance proceeds to the unit owner(s),
the governing board, may carry out the repairs or reconstruction of the unit(s). If the entire
condominium is not repaired or replaced, (1) The insurance proceeds attributable to the damaged
common elements must be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with the
LC005233/SUB A - Page 6 of 9

remainder of the condominium; (2) The insurance proceeds attributable to units and limited
common elements that are not rebuilt must be distributed to the owners of those units and the
owners of the units to which those limited common elements were allocated, or to lienholders, as
their interests may appear; and (3) The remainder of the proceeds must be distributed to all the unit
owners or lienholders, as their interests may appear, in proportion to the common element interests
of all the units. If the unit owners vote not to rebuild any unit, that unit’s allocated interests are
automatically reallocated upon the vote as if the unit had been condemned under § 34-36.1-1.07(a)
and the association promptly shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration
reflecting the reallocations. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, § 34-36.1-2.18
governs the distribution of insurance proceeds if the condominium is terminated.
(i) In the event a unit owner sustains damage to the owner’s unit as a result of an event that
is covered under the insurance coverage purchased in accordance with this section, then upon
written request to the condominium association, the unit owner shall be entitled to a written copy
from the condominium association of the insurance company damage appraisal or any damage
appraisal in regard to damage to the owner’s unit, within fourteen (14) calendar days of the date of
the unit owner’s request, or within fourteen (14) days of the association’s receipt of the damage
appraisal, whichever is later. If coverage for the damage to a unit is denied for any reason or is
deemed to be valued below the policy deductible, then the unit owner shall also be entitled to
receive, from the association, a copy of the letter detailing the determination.
(j) The provisions of this section may be varied or waived in the case of a condominium
all of whose units are restricted to nonresidential use.
(k) If the association maintains property insurance on the units, unit owners shall maintain,
to the extent reasonably available, the following insurance:
(1) Property insurance for improvements and betterments installed in their units after the
first conveyances of the units to persons other than a declarant, if the association does not maintain
such coverage.
(2) Insurance for any amount of loss covered by the association property insurance policy
but not payable under the association property insurance policy because of the application of the
deductible. There shall be no obligation on an association to apply common expenses related to a
unit after a unit loss if the unit owner fails to comply with this section.
(l) If the association does not maintain property insurance on the units, unit owners shall
maintain property insurance on their units as defined in the association’s declaration and/or bylaws.
There shall be no obligation on an association to apply common expenses related to a unit after a
unit loss if the unit owner fails to comply with this section.
LC005233/SUB A - Page 7 of 9

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005233/SUB A
========
LC005233/SUB A - Page 8 of 9